apertium-skr.skr.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot
چور[m,unmarked]
دھی[f,unmarked]
خیر[f,unmarked]
ایمان[m,unmarked]
اکھیں[f,unmarked]
بھاء[m,unmarked]
لوک[m,unmarked]
جاہ[f,unmarked]
ݙو[m,unmarked]
گھر[m,unmarked]
ہتھ[m,unmarked]
ماء[f,unmarked]
مون٘ہہ[m,unmarked]
ڳالھ[f,unmarked]
کم[m,unmarked]
سر[m,unmarked]
رن[f,unmarked]
پیر[m,unmarked]
سئیں[m,unmarked]
یار[m,unmarked]
پتر[m,unmarked]
کار[f,unmarked]
ذات[f,unmarked]
دل[m,unmarked]
رات[f,unmarked]
گھیو[m,unmarked]
<<<<<<< HEAD
سلام[m,unmarked]
سیب[m, unmakred]
=======
>>>>>>> origin/master
سلام[I,m]
صحت[I,m]
صحت[f,unmarked]
صبر[m,unmarked]
سس[I,f]
پروݨ[m]
وخت[m,unmarked]
کتّ[m] #Dir/LR
ذال[I,f]
دھی[I,f]
دُھپ[I,m]
حیا[I,f]
حیاتی[I,f]
چھڄ[I,f]
جَیں[I,f]
سال[I,m]
رام[m,unmarked]
ݙینہہ[m,unmarked]
برکت[I,f]
بھُوم[m,unmarked]
اکّھ[I,f]
آخرت[f,unmarked]
ہتھ[m]
نیت[I,f]
شَئے[I,f]
نور[I,m]
من٘جھ[I,m]
ملک[I,m]
مت[I,f]
مُتر[m,unmarked]
مالک[I,m]
قوم[I,f]
قسمت[I,f]
قرار[m,unmarked]
قتل[I,m]
فرمانبردار[f]
عمر[I,f]
عزت[I,f]
طمع[f,unmarked]
شین٘ہ[m,unmarked]
آتن:آتن[m,f]
آجڑی:آجڑی[m]
آخرت:آخرت[f]
آس:آس[f]
آسرا:آسرا[m,f]
آشنائی:آشنائی[m,f]
آلس:آلس[m,f]
آلݨا:آلݨ[m]
آلہڑاں:آلہڑاں[m,f]
آمدن:آمدن[m,f]
آنا:آن[m]
آندھی:آندھی[m,f]
ابا:اب[m]
قصائی[m,unmarked]
ہتھوں[m,unmarked]
ککڑ[I,m]
لعنت[I,f]
غم[I,m]
ذالیں[f,unmarked]
دار[m,unmarked]
اکّھیں[f,unmarked]
ݙیہاڑے:ݙیہاڑ[m]
گھڑا:گھڑ[m]
گن٘دا:گن٘د[m]
پروݨ[m,unmarked]
اُبھے:اُبھے[m,f]
ابے:ابے[m,f]
اُٻاسی:اُٻاسی[m,f]
اٻل:اٻل[m,f]
اتبار:اتبار[m,f]
اٹا:اٹ[m]
اٹا:اٹا[m]
اٹھا:اٹھ[m]
اٹھ:اٹھ[m]
اُٹھ:اُٹھ[m]
اُٹھ:اُٹھ[m,f]
اجائی:اجائ[f]
اجر:اجر[m,f]
اجڑ:اجڑ[m,f]
اچار:اچار[m]
اچھل:اچھل[m,f]
اِحساس:اِحساس[m,f]
احسان:احسان[m]
احکاماں:احکاماں[m,f]
احمق:احمق[m,f]
اَحمق:اَحمق[m,f]
ادھار:ادھار[m]
اُݙائی:اُݙائی[m,f]
اُݙدی:اُݙد[f]
اݙوں:اݙوں[m,f]
اُݙوں:اُݙوں[m,f]
ارتھ:ارتھ[m,f]
اُرسی:اُرس[f]
اَرمان:اَرمان[I,m]
اروڑی:اروڑ[I,f]
اڑی:اڑ[f]
اسبغول:اسبغول[m,unmarked]
اَستاوے:اَستاو[m]
اُسترے:اُستر[m]
اسرائیل:اسرائیل[m,unmarked]
اسمان:اسمان[m]#DIR/LR
اَسمان:اَسمان[m]#DIR/LR
اسوں:اسوں[m,unmarked]
اشارا:اشار[m]
اشراف:اشراف[m,unmarked]
اعتبار:اعتبار[m,unmarked]
اعتکاف:اعتکاف[m,unmarked]
اغرور:اغرور[m,unmarked]
اَک:اَک[m]
اکھ:اکھ[f]
اکھریں:اکھر[f]
اُکھلی:اُکھل[f]
اکھوں:اکھ[f]
اَگھ:اَگھ[m]
اڳاڑی:اڳاڑ[f]
اڳلیاں:اڳل[f]
اُلاریا:اُلاری[m]
امان:امان[f,unmarked]
اماں:اماں[f,unmarked]#DIR/LR
امّاں:امّاں[f,unmarked]#DIR/LR
اُمّت:اُمّت[I,f]#DIR/LR
اُمت:اُمت[I,f]#DIR/LR
امدݨ:امدݨ[f,unmarked]
امڑی:امڑی[f,unmarked]
امید:امید[f]#DIR/LR
اُمید:اُمید[f]#DIR/LR
امیر:امیر[m]
ان٘بار:ان٘بار[m]
اِنتظام:اِنتظام[m,f]
اَندر:اَندر[m,f]
اندھارے:اندھارے[m,f]
اندھی:اندھی[m,f]
ان٘دھی:ان٘دھی[m,f]
انڈے:انڈے[m,f]
انسانیت:انسانیت[m,f]
ان٘ڳارا:ان٘ڳارا[m,f]
ان٘ڳل:ان٘ڳل[f]
اݨ:اݨ[m,f]
اہمیت:اہمیت[f]
اوپریاں:اوپریاں[m,f]
اوتریاں:اوتریاں[m,f]
اوݙے:اوݙے[m,f]
اوگھ:اوگھ[m]
اولاد:اولاد[f]
اولاد:اولاد[m]
اوّلیاں:اوّلیاں[m,f]
اون٘دا:اون٘د[m]

کان٘و:کان٘و[I,m]
اوہا:اوہا[m,f]
ایاݨا:ایاݨا[m,f]
ایپ:ایپ[m,f]
ایݙے:ایݙے[m,f]
ایرا:ایر[m]
ایکا:ایکا[m,f]
ایمان:ایمان[m]
اِیمان:اِیمان[m]
ایہو:ایہو[m,f]
بئھیوال:بئھیوال[m,f]
بابا:باب[m]
بابل:بابل[m]
بابے:بابے[m,f]
باپ:باپ[m]
بادشاہ:بادشا[m]
باݙر:باݙر[m,f]
بار:بار[m,f]
باری:باری[m,f]
بازار:بازار[m]
باز:باز[m]
بازی:باز[f]
باغ:باغ[m]
باغبان:باغبان[m,f]
باقی:باقی[m,f]
باکری:باکری[m,f]
بال:بال[m]
کال[m,unmarked]
پیار[m,unmarked]
نوکر[I,m]
مہاڑ[I,m]
سُن٘ڄ[I,f]
زیان[m,unmarked]
تن[I,m]
ارواح[f,unmarked]
بانات:بانات[m,f]
باندراں:باندراں[m,f]
بان٘در:بان٘در[m,f]
بان٘دری:بان٘در[f]
باندری:باندری[m,f]
باندی:باند[f]
بان٘دی:بان٘د[f]
بت:بت[m,f]
ڳن٘ڈھ[I,f]
بتݨ:بتݨ[m]
بٹھ:بٹھ[f]
بُجا:بُج[m]
بجلی:بجل[f]
بختاں:بختاں[m,f]
بخت:بخت[f]
بختی:بخت[f]
بخشش:بخشش[m,f]
کپاہ[f,unmarked]
دھپ[f,unmarked]
داروں[f,unmarked]
حکیم[m,unmarked]
چراغ[m,unmarked]
ڄاݨن[m,unmarked]
جوان[m,unmarked]
ٹھیک[m,unmarked]
ٹٻر[m,unmarked]
تخت[m,unmarked]
پیکیں[f,unmarked]
پیریں[m,unmarked]
پوہ[m,unmarked]
ٻیلی[m,unmarked]
ٻان٘ھ[f,unmarked]
بھاہ[f,unmarked]
بابو[f,unmarked]
اروڑی[f,unmarked]
بابل[m,unmarked]
وپار[m,unmarked]
کن٘دھ[f,unmarked]
کندھ[f,unmarked]
واء[m,unmarked]
ہاتھی[m,unmarked]
نائی[m,unmarked]
میل[f,unmarked]
کنّی[f,unmarked]
مچھی[f,unmarked]
لوݨ[m,unmarked]
صدقے[m,unmarked]
چوری[f,unmarked]
ڄیٹھ[m,unmarked]
صدقہ[m,unmarked]
شکار[m,unmarked]
سِک[f,unmarked]
ستھݨ[f,unmarked]
سبھو[f,unmarked]
رنگ[m,unmarked]
رڑھ[f,unmarked]
رت[f,unmarked]
ڈھول[m,unmarked]
خون[m,unmarked]
چوڑ[f,unmarked]
جن[m,unmarked]
تیرھاں[f,unmarked]
پیڑ[f,unmarked]
پڑوپی[f,unmarked]
ٻار[f,unmarked]
ٻاجھ[f,unmarked]
بیج[f,unmarked]
بھاڳ[f,unmarked]
باغ[f,unmarked]
ان٘ڳل[f,unmarked]
اسوں[m,unmarked]
وپار[m,unmarked]
وات[f,unmarked]
پوہ[m,unmarked]
ٻیلی[m,unmarked]
آس[f,unmarked]
ݙینہہ[m,unmarked]
